South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3345.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 53 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 53-3-320.  The twentieth day of January each year is designated as "South Carolina Mentoring Day" in South Carolina. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----